Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2410.01
Facility operated primarily for
caring for persons with head injuries and associated disorders, defined.

Facility
operated primarily for caring for persons with head injuries and associated
disorders means a nursing home in which all or a majority of the persons served
by the nursing home have head injuries and associated disorders.

Laws 2013, LB42, § 3.